California statutes. Education Code
If the unified school district’s first apportionment under this chapter was for a grade level consisting of kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, grades 1 to 8, inclusive, grades 7 to 12, inclusive, grades 9 to 12, inclusive, or grades 7 to 10, inclusive, “eligible bonded debt service” means the amount raised and to be raised by the district during the current fiscal year for the repayment of principal and interest on the portion of the indebtedness that was incurred for elementary and high school purposes prior to the making of the first apportionment under this chapter computed as provided in Section 16072 together with the amount of the annual
 repayment under Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16071.5.

The amounts raised and to be raised by the district during the current fiscal year for repayment of principal and interest for any bonds, issued and sold by an applicant district, which are in excess of the “basic bond requirement,” as defined in Section 16002.5, shall not be considered as “eligible bonded debt service” for purposes of computing repayments or deferments pursuant to Sections 16070, 16072, 16073, 16084 and 16086.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16072.

On or before the first day of December of each fiscal year, the Director of General Services shall determine for each grade level and certify to the Controller the eligible bonded debt service for the district, as follows:

(a) He or she shall determine the amount of the bonded indebtedness that was incurred by the district for each grade level, when bonds were issued and sold for purposes of more than one grade level. When one or more additional apportionments have been made to a grade level of a school
 district, conditioned upon the issuance and sale of additional bonds of the district or upon the requirement that the proceeds of bonds issued and sold be contributed for the purposes of the application for which the apportionment is made, the Director of General Services shall determine and include in the eligible bonded debt service and in his certificate the amount raised and to be raised by the district during the current fiscal year for the payment of principal and interest on that portion of the additional bonded indebtedness of the district that was incurred for each such grade level as a condition to receiving the additional apportionment or which was incurred for bonds issued and sold, the proceeds of which were required to be contributed for purposes for which the apportionment was made.

(b) If the Director of General Services determines in any fiscal year that the amount certified to the Controller as the eligible bonded debt service
 during the last preceding fiscal year is more than the amount actually raised by the district for the repayment of principal and interest of the bonded indebtedness referred to in subdivision (d) of Section 16070 and subdivision (a) of this section, then the Director of General Services shall subtract from the amount determined as the eligible bonded debt service for the current fiscal year an amount equal to the difference between the amount actually raised by the district during the preceding fiscal year for the repayment of such bonded indebtedness and the amount so certified by the Director of General Services.

(c) If the Director of General Services determines in any fiscal year that the amount certified to the Controller as the eligible bonded debt service during the last preceding fiscal year is less than the amount actually raised by the district for the repayment of principal and interest of the bonded indebtedness referred to in
 subdivision (d) of Section 16070 and subdivision (a) of this section, then the Director of General Services shall add to the amount determined as the eligible bonded debt service for the current fiscal year an amount equal to the difference between the amount actually raised by the district during the preceding fiscal year for the repayment of the bonded indebtedness and the amount so certified by the Director of General Services.

(d) If an apportionment has been made to a district for a grade level for which the district also received an apportionment pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part, the Controller shall determine the amount of the annual repayment, if any, due from the district during the next succeeding fiscal year for the grade level as required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part and the amount shall be included by the Controller in the eligible bonded debt service of the district
 for that grade level. For an apportionment to a unified district for a grade level consisting of kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, for which an application for an apportionment was filed on or after the effective date of the amendment to this section made at the 1961 session of the Legislature, if an apportionment had also been made to the district pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part for a grade level consisting of kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, or 1 to 8, inclusive, or grades 7 to 12, inclusive, 9 to 12, inclusive, or 7 to 10, inclusive, the Controller shall determine the amount of the annual repayment, if any, due from the district during the next succeeding fiscal year for all of the grade levels as required by Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) and the amount shall be included by the Controller in the eligible bonded debt service of the district for the grade level consisting of kindergarten, if any, and grades 1 to 12,
 inclusive.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16072.5.

Whenever a school district has applied the proceeds of a sale of local bonds to a project pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 17032, the Director of General Services shall include in the determination of the eligible bonded debt service of the district, the amount raised or to be raised for repayment of principal and interest on that portion of the bonded indebtedness of the district generating the proceeds.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16073.

Whenever (a) a school district which has not sold bonds within two fiscal years immediately preceding the fiscal year in which a repayment computation is made pursuant to this article; and (b) the district is not eligible for deferment under Section 16084 or 16086 and has been required during the fiscal year in which repayment computations are made to issue bonds in order to qualify for an apportionment; and (c) no funds for the required bond issue have been provided during that year in the district’s bond interest and redemption fund budget, the Director of General
 Services shall determine the eligible portion of the amount required from taxes for the required issue during the next succeeding fiscal year and shall certify the amount to the Controller as additional eligible debt service prior to the levy of taxes during such fiscal year. The provisions of this section shall apply to the qualifying bond requirements commencing with the 1972–73 fiscal year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16074.

On or before the first day of January of each fiscal year, the Controller shall compute for each grade level of a district for which grade level an apportionment has become final during any preceding fiscal year the 40-cent tax amount, the 30-cent tax amount and the 10-cent tax amount.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16075.

On or before the first day of January of each fiscal year the Controller shall determine the annual repayment, if any, to be due from each district during the next succeeding fiscal year, as follows:

(a) If, for any grade level of a district, the amount of the eligible bonded debt service exceeds the 40-cent tax amount, no annual repayment shall be due the state from such district with respect to such grade level during the next succeeding fiscal year.

(b) If, for any grade level of a district, the 40-cent tax amount is greater than the eligible bonded debt service, the amount of such excess shall constitute the annual repayment due the state with respect to such grade level during the next succeeding fiscal year; except that if the eligible bonded debt service is less than the 10-cent tax amount, the annual repayment shall equal the 30-cent tax amount.

(c) The total repayment for each district is the sum of the annual repayments determined for each grade level of the district under this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16076.

Whenever the Director of General Services has certified an additional amount of eligible debt service under the provisions of Section 16073, the Controller shall make a recomputation of the annual repayment and notify, in writing, the board of supervisors of the county, the governing board of the district, the county auditor, and the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district of the revised repayment. The recomputation and notification shall be completed prior to the date on which the board of supervisors makes the levy of taxes for county
 purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16077.

If an apportionment is made for a project which includes a multipurpose room the board shall determine and specify the portion of the apportionment that is allocated to the cost of the multipurpose room.

If a district receives an apportionment a portion of which is for a multipurpose room it shall repay the principal amount of such portion of the apportionment as an additional payment as provided by this section. Interest on the total apportionment shall be paid as provided in Section 16083. The repayment is in addition to
 the repayments required on the total of all apportionments to the district, which shall be repaid as otherwise provided in this chapter.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 16083 and 16087 for cancellation of the principal amount of apportionments the Controller shall continue to make the deduction provided by Section 16080 during each fiscal year thereafter until the principal amount of the portion of the apportionment that was allocated to the cost of the multipurpose room and was made and disbursed to the district has been withheld, or for an additional period of 10 years, whichever first occurs. At the expiration of 40 years from the first day of July of the fiscal year next succeeding the fiscal year in which the apportionment became final, the unpaid balance of the principal amount of the portion of the apportionment shall be canceled on the books of the State Controller and the provisions of Section 16083 shall thereupon become applicable thereto and
 the board shall execute a conveyance to the district as provided in Section 16087.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16078.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the total amount of the repayment made each year by each school district to which one or more apportionments have been made under this chapter shall not be less than the amount of the cost to the state for that year to pay principal and interest on the bonded indebtedness incurred to fund the apportionment or apportionments made to that district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16079.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, and regardless of how many apportionments are made to a grade level of a school district under the provisions of this chapter, the total annual repayment for such grade level during any fiscal year, covering all such apportionments, shall not exceed the amount that would be computed under Sections 16070 to 16080, inclusive, for any one of such apportionments.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16080.

The Controller shall, during the next fiscal year following that in which he or she determines the annual repayment as herein provided, deduct the total amount of the annual repayment of each district in equal amounts from each of the February, March, April, and May installments of the apportionments made to the district from the State School Fund under Sections 46304, 46305, and 41050 and 92, Sections 41330 to 41343, inclusive, and Sections 41600 to 41972, inclusive, and, on order of the Controller, the amount so deducted shall be transferred to the State School
 Building Aid Fund. All money transferred to the State School Building Aid Fund under this section shall be available only for transfer to the General Fund of Section 16403.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16080.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, for any school district that qualifies under subdivision (b), as certified by the State Allocation Board, the Controller, upon receipt of a written request to that effect from the governing board of the school district, shall reduce the tax amount that would otherwise be utilized in computing the district’s annual repayment obligation under this chapter by the amount of 50 percent.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall apply to any
 school district in which, on or after January 1, 1989, the voters of the district approve a local general obligation bond measure, which measure includes within its purposes the funding of school facilities construction or reconstruction. Subdivision (a) shall apply to a district that qualifies under this subdivision as of the day following the date of that voter approval.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16081.

Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, whenever in any fiscal year, pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 5096), Part 9, Division 1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, a refund is made or a judgment rendered, as the case may be, for the return of an amount collected as school district taxes levied during a previous year upon secured or unsecured personal property, because it was determined that such property was exempt from taxation, and such property so determined to be exempt equals 1 percent, or more, of the assessed valuation in the school
 district upon which school district taxes for such previous year were levied, the Controller shall reduce the annual repayment of the district and the amount deducted from the State School Fund apportionment of such district for the fiscal year next succeeding that in which such refund was made or judgment rendered, by that amount by which the annual repayment and deduction of the district would have been reduced for the fiscal year next succeeding that in which such taxes were levied had the assessed valuation upon which such annual repayment was computed not included an amount of assessed valuation equal to the amount of assessed valuation of the property so determined to be exempt.

The amount of annual repayment and deduction, reduced as required by this section, shall be the amount deducted by the Controller for the purposes of Sections 16080, 16089 and 16090 for the fiscal year in which such reduction is made.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16082.

(a) Upon request of the district, the Controller shall use in computing the “40-cent, 30-cent, and 10-cent tax amounts” under Section 16070 the difference between the total assessed valuation of property in a district as shown on the equalized assessment roll for the current fiscal year and the assessed valuation of property as shown on the equalized assessment roll for the current fiscal year, in excess of 2 percent of such total assessed valuation, with respect to which revenues of the district taxes levied in the 1954–1955 fiscal year, or
 thereafter, have been impounded by the county auditor pursuant to Section 14240. Beginning with the 1981–82 fiscal year, the difference in excess of 0.50 percent of the total assessed value shall be used in the computation. If the request is received prior to August 1, 1955, with respect to the impounding of revenues of taxes levied during the 1954–1955 fiscal year, the Controller shall recompute the annual repayment of the district due during the 1955–1956 fiscal year on the basis of the reduced assessed valuation, and, on or before September 1, 1955, notify the officers and board referred to in Section 16089 of the recomputed annual repayment for the 1955–1956 fiscal year, and of the recomputed amount to be deducted from the State School Fund apportionment to the district during the 1955–1956 fiscal year.

(b) Whenever, after July 1, 1955, the county auditor notifies the Superintendent of Public Instruction and the Controller of the release of
 impounded tax revenues to the school district, the Controller shall add to the annual repayment of the district for the first fiscal year or second fiscal year next succeeding that in which the notification of release was made, that amount by which the annual repayment of the district for a previous fiscal year was reduced by reason of the exclusion of assessed valuation with respect to tax revenues impounded and thereafter released.

(c) The amount of annual repayment and deduction, increased or reduced as required by this section, shall be the amount deducted by the Controller for the purposes of Sections 16080, 16089, and 16090 for the fiscal year in which the increase or reduction occurs.

(d) If a request is received from a school district and an annual repayment reduced pursuant to subdivision (a) hereof, Section 16081 shall not apply with respect to any tax revenues to which
 subdivision (a) applies.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16083.

The Controller shall make the deduction provided by Section 16080 during each fiscal year, as herein provided, until the principal amount of the apportionment made and disbursed to the district for the grade level, and all accrued interest due thereon, has been withheld; but no interest shall accrue, or become due and payable, to the state with respect to the principal amount of the apportionment, or any portion thereof, for any period of time following the expiration of 25 years after the first day of July of the fiscal year next succeeding the fiscal year in which
 the apportionment becomes final. At the expiration of 30 years from the first day of July of the fiscal year next succeeding the fiscal year in which the apportionment became final, the unpaid balance of the principal amount of the apportionment disbursed to the district, including all interest included in the principal amount as provided in Section 16088, shall be canceled on the books of the Controller; and the state shall have no further right to the repayment of the unpaid balance. Notwithstanding the provisions of this section, that portion of the “annual repayment,” if any, computed by the Controller under Section 16075 prior to the date of cancellation of the principal amount of an apportionment under this section, which has not been withheld by the Controller, as provided by Section 16080, prior to the date of the cancellation, shall be withheld by the Controller, as provided by Section 16080, subsequent to the effective date of the cancellation; and the amount so withheld shall be credited to the
 school district in determining the principal amount of the apportionment, including all interest included therein, which is canceled under the provisions hereof. The grade level shall be excluded from any computations provided under Sections 16070, 16071, 16072, 16074, and 16075, in making the computations, after the effective date of the cancellation, to determine the “annual repayment,” if any, that may thereafter be due the state from the school district with respect to other grade levels thereof.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16084.

If, on or before June 30th of any fiscal year, the governing board of any school district files a request with the Controller for a deferment of the annual repayment due from the district during the next succeeding fiscal year for an apportionment received by the district pursuant to this chapter or Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part, and it is determined, in accordance with this section, that the district is entitled to a deferment of all or part of the annual repayment, the deferment shall be made in accordance with the determination. The
 request for deferment, having once been filed with the Controller, shall remain in effect each ensuing year, and the Controller shall continue to compute and allow the deferment in accordance with this section each year, until the time as the governing board of the school district files a written request with the Controller to discontinue the deferment.

As used in the preceding paragraph, “any school district” means a district which is liable for the repayment of the principal amount of apportionments made to the district under the provisions of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part and which has received a conditional apportionment under this chapter.

The portion of the annual repayment to be deferred under this section shall be determined as follows:

There shall be computed the amount required to be raised by taxes on property within the district, during the
 fiscal year in which the annual repayment is to be deducted pursuant to Sections 15735 and 16080, for the payment of principal and interest on (a) any bonded indebtedness incurred for school purposes prior to the first conditional apportionment to the school district under this chapter, (b) any bonded indebtedness which was incurred as a condition to any apportionment under this chapter, and (c) any bonded indebtedness incurred, the proceeds of which were required to be contributed for the purposes for which an apportionment was made under this chapter. To this amount shall be added the amount required during such fiscal year, for the annual repayment of school building apportionments under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part and under this chapter. The total of these amounts shall constitute the “basic tax amount.”

If the applicant district is a unified district, the amount to be deferred shall be separately considered for each grade level
 thereof. For this purpose, the basic tax amount shall only include the amounts specified in the preceding paragraph required to be raised for the repayment of principal and interest on bonded indebtedness which was incurred for, or as a condition to receiving an apportionment for, or required by the board to be contributed for the purposes of, the grade level being considered, plus those amounts required for the annual repayment of apportionments made under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part for the grade level. It is hereby declared that this paragraph is not intended as a change in the present law but rather as a declaration of existing law.

There shall be computed the amount which would be produced by a tax of forty-five cents ($0.45) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the district during the year, to be known as the “45-cent tax amount,” except beginning with the 1981–82 fiscal year, the amount shall be produced by a
 tax of 0.1125 percent of the full value. The amount of the annual repayment to be deferred during the fiscal year in which the annual repayment is due shall be the amount, if any, by which the basic tax amount exceeds the 45-cent tax amount. The amount deferred shall be added to the annual repayment for the next succeeding fiscal year.

On or before the last day of July of each fiscal year, the Controller shall request the Director of General Services to, and the Director of General Services shall, determine and certify to the Controller the amount of bonded debt service included in the “basic tax amount.” On or before the third Monday in August of each fiscal year, the Controller shall request the county auditor of each county to, and the county auditor of each county shall, determine and certify to the Controller the current assessed valuation of property within each district which has filed a request for a deferment under this section.

Before the date on which the board of supervisors makes the levy of taxes for county purposes, the Controller shall make the deferment determination required by this section for each district requesting a deferment, and, for each district which is entitled to a deferment, shall notify, in writing, the board of supervisors of the county, the governing board of the district, the county auditor, and the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district of the amount of the repayment of the district which is to be deferred under this section.

For the purposes of this section the “annual repayment” means the amount of the annual repayment of the district due in a fiscal year as determined pursuant to Section 15733 and Section 16075, plus the then unpaid deferred amount of any annual repayment due in any previous fiscal years. Any repayments by a district of a deferred amount shall be first applied to loans
 granted under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700) of this part.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if, at the end of the 30-year period provided in Section 15738 or Section 16083, as the case may be, there are any deferred amounts due in any previous fiscal year remaining unpaid, repayments shall continue to be made in the manner provided by this section during each fiscal year thereafter until the amounts are paid, or for an additional period of 10 years, whichever first occurs. At the expiration of the additional 10-year period the unpaid portion of the deferred amounts shall be canceled on the books of the Controller, and the provisions of Section 15738 or Section 16083, as the case may be, shall thereupon become applicable thereto and the board shall execute a conveyance to the district as provided in Section 15739 or 16087, whichever is applicable.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16085.

For purposes of computing, under Section 16084, the portion of the annual repayment to be deferred in the case of a unified school district which has applied for and received an apportionment under Section 16003, the “45-cent tax amount” shall be the amount produced by a tax of ninety cents ($0.90) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the district during the year, except beginning with the 1981–82 fiscal year the tax shall be 0.225 percent of the full value.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16086.

The provisions of this section shall apply: (1) to any school district which has succeeded to and become vested with all duties, powers, purposes, jurisdiction, and responsibility with respect to a portion of an apportionment determined or redetermined to have been expended, or to be expendable, for property acquired or to be acquired by it, and which has become liable for a portion of the annual repayment of a portion of an apportionment, as provided in Section 16159; and (2) to any state-aided district a portion of the territory of which was transferred to a
 district described in (1), above, and in connection with which territory a portion of an apportionment made to such state-aided district has or will be expended for property acquired or to be acquired.

If, on or before June 30 of any fiscal year, the governing board of the school district files a request with the Controller for a deferment of the annual repayment due from such district during the next succeeding fiscal year for an apportionment received by the district pursuant to this chapter, and it is determined, in accordance with this section, that the district is entitled to a deferment of all or part of the annual repayment, the deferment shall be made in accordance with the determination. The request for deferment, once filed with the Controller, shall remain in effect in each ensuing year, and the Controller shall continue to compute and allow the deferment in accordance with this section each year, until the time as the governing board of the school
 district files a written request with the Controller to discontinue the deferment.

The portion of the annual repayment to be deferred under this section shall be determined as follows:

There shall be computed the amount required to be raised by taxes on property within the district during the fiscal year in which the annual repayment is to be deducted pursuant to Section 16080, for the payment of principal and interest on: (a) that portion of the annual repayment and all other payments due the state under Section 16075 and other provisions of this chapter with respect to the portion of the apportionment for which the district has been determined to be liable under Section 16159; (b) any bonded indebtedness incurred for school purposes prior to the first conditional apportionment to the school district under this chapter; (c) any bonded indebtedness which was incurred as a condition to any apportionment under this chapter;
 and (d) any bonded indebtedness incurred, the proceeds of which were required to be contributed for the purposes for which an apportionment was made under this chapter. To this amount shall be added the amount required during the fiscal year, for the annual repayment of school building apportionments under this chapter. The total of these amounts shall constitute the “basic tax amount.”

If the applicant district is a unified district, the amount to be deferred shall be separately considered for each grade level thereof. For this purpose, the basic tax amount shall only include the amounts specified in the preceding paragraph required to be raised for the repayment of principal and interest on bonded indebtedness which was incurred for, or as a condition to receiving an apportionment for, or required by the board to be contributed for the purposes of, the grade level being considered, plus those amounts required for the annual repayment of apportionments made under
 this chapter for the grade level.

There shall be computed the amount which would be produced by a tax of forty cents ($0.40) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the district during such year, to be known as the “40-cent tax amount,” except beginning with the 1981–82 fiscal year, the amount shall be produced by a tax of 0.10 percent of the full value of the district during such year. The amount of the annual repayment to be deferred during the fiscal year in which the annual repayment is due shall be the amount, if any, by which the basic tax amount exceeds the 40-cent tax amount. The amount deferred shall be added to the annual repayment for the next succeeding fiscal year.

On or before the last day of July of each fiscal year, the Controller shall request the Director of General Services to, and the Director of General Services shall, determine and certify to the Controller the amount of bonded debt
 service included in the “basic tax amount.” On or before the third Monday in August of each fiscal year, the Controller shall request the county auditor of each county to, and the county auditor of each county shall, determine and certify to the Controller the current assessed valuation of property within each district which has filed a request for a deferment under this section.

Before the date on which the board of supervisors makes the levy of taxes for county purposes, the Controller shall make the deferment determination required by this section for each district requesting a deferment, and, for each district which is entitled to a deferment, shall notify, in writing, the board of supervisors of the county, the governing board of the district, the county auditor, and the county superintendent of schools having jurisdiction over the district of the amount of the repayment of the district which is to be deferred under this section.

For the purposes of this section the “annual repayment” means the amount of the annual repayment of the district due in a fiscal year as determined pursuant to Section 16075, plus the then unpaid deferred amount of any annual repayment due in any previous fiscal years.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if, at the end of the 30-year period provided in Section 16083 there are any deferred amounts due in any previous fiscal year remaining unpaid, repayments shall continue to be made in the manner provided by this section during each fiscal year thereafter until the amounts are paid, or for an additional period of 10 years, whichever first occurs. At the expiration of the additional 10-year period the unpaid portion of the deferred amounts shall be canceled on the books of the Controller, and the provisions of Section 16083 shall thereupon become applicable thereto and the board shall execute a conveyance to the
 district as provided in Section 16087.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16086.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, where an election is or has been held after March 1, 1979, and prior to December 1, 1979, for the purpose of forming a new unified school district, coterminous with an existing elementary school district, and such reorganization becomes effective for all purposes on July 1, 1980, such unified school district shall be eligible for a deferment of annual repayment as set forth in Section 16086, except that the “basic tax amount” shall be computed as the sum of (a) that portion of the original high school repayment
 for which the new district is liable and (b) that portion of the original high school eligible debt service computed pursuant to Section 16072 for which the new district is liable, as provided in Section 4147.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16087.

The Controller shall certify to the board the cancellation of the unpaid balance of the principal amount of the apportionment. Upon receipt of the certification, the board shall, in the name of the state, convey to the district all sites purchased and improved, all equipment purchased, and all buildings constructed, reconstructed, altered, or added to, from money provided by the apportionment covered by the cancellation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16088.

The Controller shall determine and maintain a record of the amount due the state in connection with each apportionment made to each grade level of a district under the provisions of this chapter. He or she shall compute interest, at the rate fixed by the board, on each amount disbursed by the state pursuant to the apportionment, from the date of issuance of the Controller’s warrant covering the payment to the county treasurer of the amount until the first day of July of the fiscal year next succeeding that in which the warrant was issued. Thereafter, interest shall
 accrue to and be compounded as a part of the principal amount due the state pursuant to the apportionment, through the 30th day of the following June of each year, until the principal and interest have been paid, or until the interest ceases to accrue, as provided in this chapter. Interest on unpaid school building aid apportionments shall be computed as if the annual repayment were credited on the first day of July of the fiscal year in which the repayment is withheld.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16089.

Upon computing in any fiscal year the amount to be deducted from the apportionments to the district from the State School Fund during the succeeding fiscal year, the Controller shall notify the governing board of the district and the county auditor of the county, the county superintendent of which has jurisdiction over the district, of the amount to be deducted.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16090.

The board of supervisors of the county, the county superintendent of which has jurisdiction over any district which under this chapter will have moneys withheld by the Controller from the apportionments to be made to it from the State School Fund during any fiscal year, shall annually at the time the board of supervisors makes the levy of taxes for county purposes, levy a tax upon the property in the district sufficient to raise for the district the amount of money to be withheld by the Controller during the fiscal year in which the tax is levied. Effective July 1,
 1988, that tax, when collected, shall be paid into the county treasury of the county, the county superintendent of schools of which has jurisdiction over the district for which the tax was levied, to the credit of a separate fund of the district to be known as the Tax Override Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16091.
